Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB922.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(b)(1) and (6) of the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act, are amended to read:Section 7. Application for license.* * *(b) Application contents.--The application shall require a statement showing:(1) The title or name and proposed address of the school, grades and classes, together with the name of the owners and controlling officers. An application may be submitted prior to securing a physical facility through a 1234567891011121314151617181920 lease or ownership if a facility's planning statement is included in the application and identifies the school site under active consideration, a timeline for finalizing the lease or sale and a contingency plan in the event that the lease or sale is not timely executed.* * *(6) The qualifications of teachers, professional staff and director. An application may be submitted that includes staffing projections and identifies the proposed teachers, professional staff and director who meet the qualification requirements, and who the applicant school intends to formally hire upon receipt of licensure.* * *Section 2. Section 8 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 8. Issuance and renewal of license.* * *(a.1) Conditional approval of licensure.-- (1) The board may grant conditional approval of initial licensure, which approval is provisional and temporary and does not exceed six months, if the board finds that the application and the school for which a license is sought substantially complies with this act and the rules and regulations promulgated under this act but certain application components remain pending, which may include:(i) formal hiring of staffing projections identified in the application or otherwise properly qualified staff; and(ii) submission of an occupying lease or face copy of the deed and facility inspection completed by the 20250SB0922PN1151 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department as provided for in section 12(a).(2) The board may not grant an initial license under paragraph (1) to an applicant school until the applicant school submits evidence fulfilling the conditions for approval. Failure to fulfill the conditions for approval within the six month conditional approval period shall result in revocation of the conditional approval without further notice.* * *Section 3. Section 14 of the act is amended to read:Section 14. Promulgation of rules and regulations.(a) Rules and regulations generally.--The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. The rules and regulations of the State Board of Private Academic Schools in force on the effective date of this act, and not countermanded by this act, shall remain in effect until repealed or amended by the board[, but not for a period of more than one year].(b) Qualifications for teachers, professional staff and directors .-- (1) Not later than 12 14 months after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations and establish policies, principles and standards necessary to carry out the purposes of this act as they relate to the qualifications of teachers, professional staff and directors, which policies:(i) Provide the authority for private academic schools to apply for emergency permits and long-term or day-to-day substitute permits through the department . (ii) Provide for any additional requirements, 20250SB0922PN1151 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions or exemptions as may be required to issue emergency permits, long-term or day-to-day substitute permits to accommodate the ability of private academic schools to have fully qualified and properly certificated or permitted teachers, professional staff and directors to provide instruction and student services. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the board may not issue an initial license or a renewal license to a private academic school that identifies for employment teachers, professional staff and directors qualified under paragraph (1) until the rules and regulations, policies, principles and standards required by paragraph (1) are in effect.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0922PN1151 - 4 - 1234567891011121314